North Dakota, session 69, SB2053.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 27-11-17 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
27-11-17. Fee payable by all applicants for admission to bar - Disposition of fees.
The state board of law examiners is entitled to receive a fee to be determined by the board with the
approval of the supreme court of an amount not to exceed one hundred fiftytwo hundred dollars from
each applicant for admission to the bar of this state who submits to examination by the board and a fee
to be determined by the board with the approval of the supreme court of an amount not to exceed four
hundred dollars from each applicant for admission to the bar of this state who seeks admission upon
motion in accordance with state law or supreme court rule. All fees received must be deposited and
disbursed in accordance with section 54-44-12.

S. B. NO. 2053 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2053.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 83 Nays 7 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State